Washington statutes.
RCW 9.100.040

Escape—Effect.

Escape from custody while in another state pursuant to the agreement on detainers shall constitute an offense against the laws of this state to the same extent and degree as an escape from the institution in which the prisoner was confined immediately prior to having been sent to another state pursuant to the provisions of the agreement on detainers and shall be punishable in the same manner as an escape from said institution.

[ 1967 c 34 s 4.]